South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S539.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 40-13-20 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (11) "Advanced esthetician" means a person including, but not limited to, an independent contractor, who is licensed to practice the following: (a) anything a licensed esthetician can perform pursuant to this chapter; (b) high frequency; (c) microcurrent, galvanic; (d) microneedling, dermaplaning; and (e) chemical peels with a pH between two and three. SECTION 2.  Section 40-13-110(A)(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2) permitted a person in one's employ or under one's supervision or control to practice as a cosmetologist, esthetician, advanced esthetician, or nail technician without that person being licensed as a cosmetologist, esthetician, advanced esthetician, or nail technician; SECTION 3.  Section 40-13-230 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 40-13-230. (A) A license as a cosmetologist must be issued by the board to a person who: (1) is at least sixteen years of age and possesses at least a tenth grade education or the equivalent as established by tests used in the public schools or tests approved by the board; (2) has completed at least one thousand five hundred hours in classes in cosmetology in a reliable school approved by the board or is a registered master hair care specialist pursuant to Chapter 7 who has satisfied educational requirements established by the board in regulation; and (3) has passed the examination prescribed by the board and pays the required fee. (B) A license as an esthetician must be issued by the board to a person who: (1) is at least sixteen years of age and possesses at least a tenth grade education or the equivalent as established by tests used in the public schools or tests approved by the board; (2) has completed at least four hundred fifty hours in classes in skin care in a reliable school approved by the board or comparable training approved by the board; and (3) has passed the examination prescribed by the board and pays the required fee. (C) A license as an advanced esthetician must be issued by the board to a person who: (1) is at least sixteen years of age and possesses at least a tenth grade education or the equivalent as established by tests used in the public schools or tests approved by the board; (2) has completed at least six hundred hours in classes in skin care in a reliable school approved by the board or comparable training approved by the board; and (3) has passed the examination prescribed by the board and pays the required fee. (D) A license as a nail technician must be issued by the board to a person who: (1) is at least sixteen years of age and possesses at least a tenth grade education or the equivalent as established by tests used in the public schools or tests approved by the board; (2) has completed at least three hundred hours in classes in a reliable nail technician school approved by the board or comparable training approved by the board; and (3) has passed the examination prescribed by the board and pays the required fee. (D)(E) Temporary permits to practice as a cosmetologist, esthetician, advanced esthetician, or nail technician may be issued in accordance with regulations promulgated by the board. SECTION 4.  Section 40-13-240(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B) The board shall conduct examinations of applicants for licenses to practice as cosmetologists, estheticians, advanced esthetician, or nail technicians not less than three times each year, at times and places as the board may determine. The examination of applicants for any license under this chapter must be conducted pursuant to regulations promulgated by the board and shall include both practical demonstrations and written tests on subjects the board determines to be necessary. Examinations must be consistent with the prescribed curriculum and the practical and theoretical requirements of the profession of cosmetology as prescribed in this chapter. SECTION 5.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----